Utah statutes.
62A-2-121.   Access to abuse and neglect information.

(1)  For purposes of this section:

(a)  "Direct service worker" is as defined in Section 62A-5-101.

(b)  "Personal care attendant" is as defined in Section 62A-3-101.

(2)  With respect to a licensee, a certified local inspector applicant, a direct service worker, or a personal care attendant, the department may access only the Licensing Information System of the Division of Child and Family Services created by Section 62A-4a-1006 and juvenile court records under Subsection 78A-6-323(6), for the purpose of:

(a) (i)  determining whether a person associated with a licensee, with direct access to children:

(A)  is listed in the Licensing Information System; or

(B)  has a substantiated finding by a juvenile court of a severe type of child abuse or neglect under Subsections 78A-6-323(1) and (2); and

(ii)  informing a licensee that a person associated with the licensee:

(A)  is listed in the Licensing Information System; or

(B)  has a substantiated finding by a juvenile court of a severe type of child abuse or neglect under Subsections 78A-6-323(1) and (2);

(b) (i)  determining whether a certified local inspector applicant:

(A)  is listed in the Licensing Information System; or

(B)  has a substantiated finding by a juvenile court of a severe type of child abuse or neglect under Subsections 78A-6-323(1) and (2); and

(ii)  informing a local government that a certified local inspector applicant:

(A)  is listed in the Licensing Information System; or

(B)  has a substantiated finding by a juvenile court of a severe type of child abuse or neglect under Subsections 78A-6-323(1) and (2);

(c) (i)  determining whether a direct service worker:

(A)  is listed in the Licensing Information System; or

(B)  has a substantiated finding by a juvenile court of a severe type of child abuse or neglect under Subsections 78A-6-323(1) and (2); and

(ii)  informing a direct service worker or the direct service worker's employer that the direct service worker:

(A)  is listed in the Licensing Information System; or

(B)  has a substantiated finding by a juvenile court of a severe type of child abuse or neglect under Subsections 78A-6-323(1) and (2); or

(d) (i)  determining whether a personal care attendant:

(A)  is listed in the Licensing Information System; or

(B)  has a substantiated finding by a juvenile court of a severe type of child abuse or neglect under Subsections 78A-6-323(1) and (2); and

(ii)  informing a person described in Subsections 62A-3-101(8)(a)(i) through (iv) that a personal care attendant:

(A)  is listed in the Licensing Information System; or

(B)  has a substantiated finding by a juvenile court of a severe type of child abuse or neglect under Subsections 78A-6-323(1) and (2).

(3)  Notwithstanding Subsection (2), the department may access the Division of Child and Family Service's Management Information System under Section 62A-4a-1003:

(a)  for the purpose of licensing and monitoring foster parents; and

(b)  for the purposes described in Subsection 62A-4a-1003(1)(d).

(4)  After receiving identifying information for a person under Subsection 62A-2-120(1), the department shall process the information for the purposes described in Subsection (2).

(5)  The department shall adopt rules under Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, consistent with this chapter, defining the circumstances under which a person may have direct access or provide services to children when:

(a)  the person is listed in the Licensing Information System of the Division of Child and Family Services created by Section 62A-4a-1006; or

(b)  juvenile court records show that a court made a substantiated finding under Section 78A-6-323, that the person committed a severe type of child abuse or neglect.



Amended by Chapter 75, 2009 General Session

